Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-4,143
Eligibility for incarceration work camp; Board of Parole or Director of Correctional Services; considerations; duration.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Board of Parole may recommend placement of felony offenders at the incarceration work camp. The offenders recommended by the board shall be offenders currently housed at other Department of Correctional Services adult correctional facilities and shall complete the incarceration work camp programming prior to release on parole.

(2) When the Board of Parole is of the opinion that a felony offender currently incarcerated in a Department of Correctional Services adult correctional facility may benefit from a brief and intensive period of regimented, structured, and disciplined programming immediately prior to release on parole, the board may direct placement of such an offender in an incarceration work camp for a period not to exceed one hundred eighty days as a condition of release on parole. The board may consider such placement if the felony offender (a) is medically and mentally fit to participate, with allowances given for reasonable accommodation as determined by medical and mental health professionals, and (b) has not previously been incarcerated for a violent felony crime. Offenders convicted of a crime under sections 28-319 to 28-322.07 or of any capital crime are not eligible to be placed in an incarceration work camp.

(3) The Director of Correctional Services may assign a felony offender to an incarceration work camp if he or she believes it is in the best interests of the felony offender and of society, except that offenders convicted of a crime under sections 28-319 to 28-322.07 or of any capital crime are not eligible to be assigned to an incarceration work camp pursuant to this subsection.

Laws 1997, LB 882, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 288, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 538, § 28;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 104;

Laws 2007, LB83, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB97, § 29;

Laws 2009, LB274, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 33;

Referendum 2016, No. 426;

Laws 2019, LB340, § 3;
>
Laws 2019, LB519, § 16;

Laws 2026, LB965, § 47.
July 18, 2026